Utah statutes.
48-3a-1056.   Effect of domestication.

(1)  When a domestication becomes effective:

(a)  the domesticated limited liability company is:

(i)  organized under and subject to the organic law of the domesticated limited liability company; and

(ii)  the same entity without interruption as the domesticating limited liability company;

(b)  all property of the domesticating limited liability company continues to be vested in the domesticated limited liability company without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

(c)  all debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating limited liability company continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated limited liability company;

(d)  except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of domestication, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating limited liability company remain in the domesticated limited liability company;

(e)  the name of the domesticated limited liability company may be substituted for the name of the domesticating limited liability company in any pending action or proceeding;

(f)  the certificate of organization of the domesticated limited liability company is effective;

(g)  the provisions of the operating agreement of the domesticated limited liability company that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication are effective; and

(h)  the interests in the domesticating limited liability company are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the members of the domesticating limited liability company are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any appraisal rights they have under Section 48-3a-1008.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or operating agreement of the domesticating limited liability company, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that a member, manager, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating limited liability company.

(3)  When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the domesticating limited liability company and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic limited liability company as a result of the domestication has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the domestic limited liability company and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

(4)  When a domestication becomes effective:

(a)  The domestication does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability arose before the domestication became effective.

(b)  A person does not have interest holder liability under this part for any debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

(c)  A person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by law other than this chapter, this chapter, or the operating agreement of a domestic domesticating limited liability company with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under Subsection (4)(a) as if the domestication had not occurred.

(5)  When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign limited liability company that is the domesticated limited liability company may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and liabilities as provided in Section 16-17-301.

(6)  If the domesticating limited liability company is a registered foreign limited liability company, the registration of the foreign limited liability company is canceled when the domestication becomes effective.

(7)  A domestication does not require the limited liability company to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

